Washington statutes.
RCW 5.45.010

"Business" defined.

The term "business" shall include every kind of business, profession, occupation, calling or operation of institutions, whether carried on for profit or not.

[ 1947 c 53 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 1263-1. Formerly RCW 5.44.100.]